Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 2. Hunting and Trapping.

§ 29.1-510.
Big game; small game.

For the purpose of the hunting and trapping laws of the Commonwealth, big game shall include bear and deer and small game shall include other game animals and all game birds.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-132; 1954, c. 228; 1958, c. 165; 1960, c. 537; 1962, c. 469; 1974, c. 302; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 158.

§ 29.1-511.
Open season on nuisance species.

There shall be a continuous open season for killing nuisance species of wild birds and wild animals as defined in §

29.1-100

.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-133; 1958, c. 165; 1974, c. 302; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-512.
Closed season on other species.

There shall be a continuous closed hunting season on all birds and wild animals which are not nuisance species as defined in §

29.1-100

, except as provided by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-134; 1974, c. 302; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-513.
Daily and season bag limits as promulgated by Board regulations.

It shall be lawful to hunt wild birds and wild animals specified in this article within any applicable daily and season bag limits during the open seasons as may be provided by Board regulations.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-135; 1960, c. 590; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-514.
Nonmigratory game birds.

The following nonmigratory game birds may be hunted during prescribed open seasons:Birds introduced by the Board.Bobwhite quail.Grouse.Pheasants.Turkey.

The following provisions shall also be applicable to the raising and hunting of the particular nonmigratory game bird species listed:

The Board may issue a permit to raise or purchase pheasants which shall entitle the permittee to release pheasants raised or purchased by him on land owned or leased by him, and such pheasants may be hunted under rules and regulations promulgated by the Board.

The Board may open the season, including Sunday operation, on pen-raised game birds on controlled shooting areas licensed under Chapter 6 (§

29.1-600

et seq.) of this title under regulations as may be promulgated by the Board. However, the regulations promulgated by the Board shall not allow Sunday operation in Augusta County, or in any county or city which prohibits Sunday operation by ordinance.Prior to obtaining a license from the Board to operate a commercially operated controlled shooting area, an applicant shall (i) notify adjoining landowners of the proposed use and (ii) obtain approval from the governing body of the county, city or town that such activity is permitted under existing ordinances. The requirements of clauses (i) and (ii) shall only apply to applications filed on or after July 1, 1993, for commercially operated controlled shooting area licenses issued under Chapter 6 of this title and shall not apply to existing preserve licenses or renewals issued for the shooting of pen-raised game birds.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-136; 1954, c. 228; 1956, c. 375; 1960, c. 590; 1987, c. 488; 1993, c. 87; 2007, c. 813.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Augusta County” for “those counties having a population of not less than 54,000 nor more than 55,000” in subdivision B 2.

§ 29.1-515.
Migratory game birds.

Migratory game birds may be hunted in accordance with regulations of the Board. Board regulations shall conform to the regulations of the United States government insofar as open seasons and bag limits are concerned.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-137; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-516.
Game animals.

The following provisions shall apply to the killing and hunting of the particular game animals listed:

Black bear. — A black bear may be killed by any person when (i) it is inflicting or attempting to inflict injury to a person or (ii) when a person is in pursuit of the bear commenced immediately after the commission of such offense. Any person killing a bear under this provision shall immediately report the killing to a state conservation police officer.

Deer. — It is unlawful for a person to kill or attempt to kill a deer in the water of any stream, lake, or pond. It is unlawful to hunt deer with dogs in the counties west of the Blue Ridge Mountains.

Fox. — There is a continuous open season for hunting with dogs only. The hunting or pursuit of foxes shall mean the actual following of the dogs while in pursuit of a fox or foxes or the managing of the dog or dogs, including by the use of a Global Positioning System (GPS) or other electronic tracking device, while the fox or foxes are being hunted or pursued. Nothing in this section shall preclude the managing of dogs by the use of a GPS or other electronic tracking device by hunters when hunting other game animals. Foxes may be killed at any time by the owner or tenant of any land when such animals are doing damage to domestic stock or fowl.

Rabbits and squirrels. — It is unlawful to kill rabbits or squirrels during the closed season; however, the following persons may kill rabbits or squirrels for their own use during the closed season:

A landowner and members of his immediate family;

Resident members of hunt clubs who own the land in fee, either jointly or through a holding company;

Tenants residing on the premises, with the written permission of the landowner.When such animals are committing substantial damage to fruit trees, gardens, crops, or other property, the owner of the premises may kill the animals or have them killed under a permit obtained from the conservation police officer.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-138; 1960, c. 590; 1962, c. 469; 1977, c. 377; 1980, c. 271; 1984, c. 6; 1987, c. 488; 2007, c. 87; 2013, c. 345.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in the last sentence of the paragraph defining “Black bear” and in the last paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 345 substituted “It is unlawful” for “It shall be unlawful” twice in the paragraph defining “Deer” and in the paragraph defining “Rabbits and squirrels”; substituted “A black” for “Black” at the beginning of the paragraph defining “Black bear”; in the paragraph defining “Fox,” substituted “There is” for “There shall be” in the first sentence, “the managing of” for “managing,” and inserted “including by the use of a Global Positioning System (GPS) or other electronic tracking device” in the second sentence, and added the third sentence; and substituted “rabbits or squirrels” for “rabbits and squirrels” near the beginning of the first sentence of the paragraph defining “Rabbits and squirrels.”

§ 29.1-516.1.
Using tracking dogs to retrieve bear, deer, or turkey.

Tracking dogs maintained and controlled on a lead may be used to find a wounded or dead bear, turkey, or deer statewide during any archery, muzzleloader, or firearm bear, turkey, or deer hunting season, or within 24 hours of the end of such season, provided that those who are involved in the retrieval effort have permission to hunt on or to access the land being searched. A licensed hunter who is engaged in such tracking may have in his possession a weapon permitted under this title and may use such weapon to humanely kill the wounded bear, deer, or turkey being tracked, including after legal shooting hours. Such weapon shall not be used to hunt, wound, or kill any animal other than the animal that the hunter is tracking, except in self-defense.

History.

2011, c. 459; 2018, c. 447.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 447 inserted “turkey” twice, deleted “and do not have any weapons in their possession” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second and third sentences.

§ 29.1-516.2.
Hunting with dogs; dogs to wear tags.

Any person engaged in lawful hunting with a dog shall ensure that the dog has a tag identifying the name of the owner or custodian and a current phone number. The tag shall be securely fastened to a substantial collar by the owner or custodian and worn by such dog.

History.

2022, c. 651.

§ 29.1-517.
Trapping and shooting of fur-bearing animals during closed season.

A landowner may trap or shoot fur-bearing animals upon his own land during closed season when these animals are causing damage to crops or property, or are posing a threat to human health or safety, or are otherwise causing a nuisance.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-139; 1964, c. 207; 1987, c. 488; 2004, c. 421; 2007, c. 87; 2013, c. 349.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 421 deleted “beaver” preceding “muskrats or raccoons” in the first sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 349 rewrote the section, which read: “A landowner may shoot fur-bearing animals except muskrats or raccoons, upon his own land during closed season. When muskrats or raccoons are damaging crops or dams, the owner of the premises may kill them or have them killed under a permit obtained from the conservation police officer.”

§ 29.1-518.
When killing of beaver permitted.

When beaver are damaging crops or lands, the owner of the premises, his agent or tenant, may kill the animals, or have them killed.

History.

1958, c. 147, § 29-139.1; 1987, c. 488; 2004, c. 421.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 421 deleted “substantially” preceding “damaging crops” and “under a permit obtained from the game warden” at the end.

§ 29.1-519.
Guns, pistols, revolvers, etc., which may be used; penalty.

All wild birds and wild animals may be hunted with the following weapons unless shooting is expressly prohibited:

A shotgun or muzzleloading shotgun not larger than 10 gauge;

An automatic-loading or hand-operated repeating shotgun capable of holding not more than three shells the magazine of which has been cut off or plugged with a one-piece filler incapable of removal through the loading end, so as to reduce the capacity of the gun to not more than three shells at one time in the magazine and chamber combined, unless otherwise allowed by Board regulations;

A rifle, a muzzleloading rifle, or an air rifle;

A bow and arrow;

[Expired.]

A crossbow, which is a type of bow and arrow, in accordance with the provisions of §

29.1-306

;

A slingshot, except when hunting deer, bear, elk, or turkey;

An arrowgun, which is a pneumatic-powered air gun that fires an arrow; and

A slingbow, which is a type of bow and arrow, in accordance with the provisions of §

29.1-306

except when hunting bear or elk.

A pistol, muzzleloading pistol, or revolver may be used to hunt nuisance species of birds and animals.

In the counties west of the Blue Ridge Mountains, and counties east of the Blue Ridge where rifles of a caliber larger than .22 caliber may be used for hunting wild birds and animals, game birds and animals may be hunted with pistols or revolvers firing cartridges rated in manufacturers’ tables at 350 foot pounds of energy or greater and under the same restrictions and conditions as apply to rifles, provided that no cartridge shall be used with a bullet of less than .23 caliber. In no event shall pistols or revolvers firing cartridges rated in manufacturers’ tables at 350 foot pounds of energy or greater be used if rifles of a caliber larger than .22 caliber are not authorized for hunting purposes.

The use of muzzleloading pistols and .22 caliber rimfire handguns is permitted for hunting small game where .22 caliber rifles are permitted.

The use of muzzleloading pistols of .45 caliber or larger is permitted for hunting big game where and in those seasons when the use of muzzleloading rifles is permitted. The Board may adopt regulations that specify the types of muzzleloading pistols and the projectiles and propellants that shall be permitted.

The hunting of wild birds and wild animals with fully automatic firearms, defined as a machine gun in §

18.2-288

, is prohibited.

The hunting of wild birds or wild animals with (i) weapons other than those authorized by this section or (ii) weapons that have been prohibited by this section is punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-140; 1962, c. 469; 1964, c. 441; 1974, cc. 108, 302; 1977, c. 377; 1983, c. 166; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 162; 1989, c. 421; 1993, c. 684; 1998, c. 144; 2002, c. 157; 2005, c. 8; 2007, c. 643; 2014, cc. 117, 136; 2016, c. 486; 2017, c. 530; 2018, cc. 557, 558.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 8, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Game and Inland Fisheries shall amend its regulations to comply with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2005, c. 8, cl. 3 provides: “That upon creation of the special license for hunting with a crossbow by the Board of Game and Inland Fisheries pursuant to §

29.1-306.1

of this act, subdivision A 5 of §

29.1-519

shall no longer be effective.” The special license has been created and subdivision A 5 has expired.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 157, effective January 1, 2003, inserted “or muzzleloading shotgun” in subdivision A 1; and inserted “a muzzleloading rifle, or an air rifle” in subdivision A 3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 8, effective March 4, 2005, added subdivision A 6; and made minor stylistic and related changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 643 added “unless otherwise allowed by Board regulations” at the end of subdivision A 2; and deleted “between sunrise and sunset except over inland waters, and raccoons during the legal hunting hours for said species” at the end of subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 117, in subsections B and D, substituted “muzzleloading” for “muzzle-loading”; added subsection E and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2014 amendment by c. 136, in subdivision A 6, substituted “§

29.1-306

” for “§

29.1-306

.1.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 486, in subdivision A 6, added “and” to the end of the subdivision; added subdivision A 7; in subsection G, substituted “is” for “shall be.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530 added subdivision A 8 and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 557 and 558 are identical, and inserted subdivision A 8 and made related changes.

§ 29.1-520.
Times for hunting.

Nonmigratory game birds and game animals may be hunted from one-half hour before sunrise to one-half hour after sunset. Bears may be hunted without capturing or taking from 4:00 a.m. until 10:00 p.m. during bear hound training season.

Fur-bearing animals and nuisance species of birds and animals may be hunted by day or by night, except that muskrats may be hunted by day only.

A violation of this section shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 29-141, 29-142; 1962, c. 469; 1974, c. 302; 1987, c. 488; 1989, c. 421; 2008, c. 31; 2012, cc. 69, 226.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 31 inserted the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 69 and 226 are identical, and substituted “from 4:00 a.m. until 10:00 p.m.” for “from one-half hour before sunrise until four and one-half hours after sunset” in the last sentence of subsection A.

§ 29.1-521.
Unlawful to hunt, trap, possess, sell, or transport wild birds and wild animals except as permitted; exception; penalty.

The following is unlawful:

To hunt or kill on Sunday (i) any wild bird or wild animal, including any nuisance species, with a gun, firearm, or other weapon, within 200 yards of a place of worship or any accessory structure thereof or (ii) any deer or bear with a gun, firearm, or other weapon with the aid or assistance of dogs.

To destroy or harass the nest, eggs, dens, or young of any wild bird or wild animal, except nuisance species, at any time without a permit as required by law.

To hunt or attempt to kill or trap any species of wild bird or wild animal after having obtained the daily bag or season limit during such day or season. However, any properly licensed person, or a person exempt from having to obtain a license, who has obtained such daily bag or season limit while hunting may assist others who are hunting game by calling game, retrieving game, handling dogs, or conducting drives if the weapon in his possession is an unloaded firearm, a bow without a nocked arrow, an unloaded slingbow, an unloaded arrowgun, or an unloaded crossbow. Any properly licensed person, or person exempt from having to obtain a license, who has obtained such season limit prior to commencement of the hunt may assist others who are hunting game by calling game, retrieving game, handling dogs, or conducting drives, provided he does not have a firearm, bow, slingbow, arrowgun, or crossbow in his possession.

To knowingly occupy any baited blind or other baited place for the purpose of taking or attempting to take any wild bird or wild animal or to put out bait or salt for any wild bird or wild animal for the purpose of taking or killing it. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a person charged with violating this subdivision knows that he is occupying a baited blind or other baited place for the purpose of taking or attempting to take any wild bird or wild animal. However, this shall not apply to baiting nuisance species of animals and birds, or to baiting traps for the purpose of taking fur-bearing animals that may be lawfully trapped.

To kill or capture any wild bird or wild animal adjacent to any area while a field or forest fire is in progress.

To shoot or attempt to take any wild bird or wild animal from an automobile or other vehicle, except (i) as provided in §

29.1-521.3

or (ii) for the killing of nuisance species as defined in §

29.1-100

on private property by the owner of such property or his designee from a stationary automobile or other stationary vehicle.

To set a trap of any kind on the lands or waters of another without attaching to the trap: (i) the name and address of the trapper; or (ii) an identification number issued by the Department.

To set a trap where it would be likely to injure persons, dogs, stock, or fowl.

To fail to visit all traps once each day and remove all animals caught, and immediately report to the landowner as to stock, dogs, or fowl that are caught and the date. However, the Director or his designee may authorize employees of federal, state, and local government agencies, and persons holding a valid Commercial Nuisance Animal Permit issued by the Department, to visit body-gripping traps that are completely submerged at least once every 72 hours, and the Board may adopt regulations permitting trappers to visit traps less frequently under specified conditions. The Board shall adopt regulations permitting trappers to use remote trap-checking technology to check traps under specified conditions.

To hunt, trap, take, capture, kill, attempt to take, capture, or kill, possess, deliver for transportation, transport, cause to be transported, by any means whatever, receive for transportation or export, or import, at any time or in any manner, any wild bird or wild animal or the carcass or any part thereof, except as specifically permitted by law and only by the manner or means and within the numbers stated. However, the provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the (i) use or transportation of legally taken turkey carcasses, or portions thereof, for the purposes of making or selling turkey callers; (ii) the manufacture or sale of implements, including tools or utensils made from legally harvested deer skeletal parts, including antlers; (iii) the possession of shed antlers; or (iv) the possession, manufacture, or sale of other parts or implements authorized by regulations adopted by the Board.

To offer for sale, sell, offer to purchase, or purchase, at any time or in any manner, any wild bird or wild animal or the carcass or any part thereof, except as specifically permitted by law, including subsection D of §

29.1-553

. However, any nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is (i) organized to provide wild game as food to the hungry and (ii) authorized by the Department to possess, transport, and distribute donated or unclaimed meat to the hungry may pay a processing fee in order to obtain such meat. Such fee shall not exceed the actual cost for processing the meat. In addition, any nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is (a) organized to support wildlife habitat conservation and (b) approved by the Department shall be allowed to offer wildlife mounts that have undergone the taxidermy process for sale in conjunction with fundraising activities. A violation of this subdivision shall be punishable as provided in §

29.1-553

.

To offer for sale, sell, offer to purchase, or purchase a hunt guaranteeing the killing of a deer, bear, or wild turkey. Nothing in this subdivision shall prevent a landowner from leasing land for hunting. A violation of this subdivision shall be punishable as provided in § 29.1-553.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any American Indian who produces verification that he is an enrolled member of a tribe recognized by the Commonwealth, another state, or the U.S. government, may possess, offer for sale, or sell to another American Indian, or offer to purchase or purchase from another American Indian, parts of legally obtained fur-bearing animals, nonmigratory game birds, and game animals, except bear. Such legally obtained parts shall include antlers, hooves, feathers, claws, and bones.

“Verification”
as used in this section shall include (i) display of a valid tribal identification card, (ii) confirmation through a central tribal registry, (iii) a letter from a tribal chief or council, or (iv) certification from a tribal office that the person is an enrolled member of the tribe.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Department may authorize the use of snake exclusion devices by public utilities at their transmission or distribution facilities and the incidental taking of snakes resulting from the use of such devices.

A violation of subdivisions A 1 through 10 shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-143; 1962, c. 469; 1974, c. 302; 1979, c. 264; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 175; 1989, c. 421; 1990, c. 237; 1994, cc. 244, 436; 1997, c. 249; 1998, c. 415; 2000, c. 13; 2001, cc. 26, 60; 2004, c. 862; 2005, cc. 170, 533, 534; 2006, cc. 20, 215; 2008, cc. 160, 161; 2010, c. 10; 2014, cc. 152, 482; 2015, c. 47; 2016, cc. 10, 62, 121, 372; 2017, c. 530; 2018, cc. 113, 557, 558, 620; 2019, c. 151; 2020, cc. 315, 631; 2022, c. 98.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 121, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §

29.1-521

of the Code of Virginia shall expire on July 1, 2017.” The section above does not include amendments by Acts 2016, c. 121.

Acts 2020, c. 631, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 13, in subdivision A 10, inserted the clause (i) designation, and added the language beginning “or (ii).”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 26 added present subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as C.

The 2001 amendment by c. 60, in subdivision A 3, substituted “properly licensed person, or a person exempt from having to obtain a license” for “person,” deleted “for turkeys, ducks, geese or swans” following “while hunting,” substituted “who are hunting game by calling game, retrieving game, handling dogs, or conducting drives” for “such game by calling turkeys, ducks, geese or swans,” substituted “an unloaded crossbow” for “a crossbow having an unloaded bolt,” deleted the former last sentence, which read: “A person who has obtained such season limit prior to commencement of the hunt may assist others hunting as previously described, provided he does not have a firearm, bow, or crossbow in his possession,” and added the present last sentence; and substituted “that” for “which” in subdivision A 9.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 862, in subdivision A 4, inserted “knowingly” preceding “occupy any baited blind” and inserted the second sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 170 added “including, but not limited to, subsection D of §

29.1-553

” at the end of the first sentence in subdivision A 11.

The 2005 amendment by c. 533 inserted the next-to-last sentence in subdivision A 11.

The 2005 amendment by c. 534 added the last sentence in subdivision A 1.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 20 and 215 are identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision A 9.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 160, in subdivision A 7, added the clause (i) designator and clause (ii), and made related changes.

The 2008 amendment by c. 161 added “and the Board may adopt regulations permitting trappers to visit traps less frequently under specified conditions” at the end of subdivision A 9.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 10 added clause (iii) of subdivision A 10 and made related changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 152 and 482, in subsection A, inserted “or to hunt or kill any deer or bear with a gun, firearm, or other weapon with the aid of assistance of dogs” and deleted “which is hereby declared a rest day for all species of wild bird and wild animal life, except raccoons, which may be hunted until 2:00 a.m. on Sunday mornings” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence; and in subsection C, inserted “A” and deleted “of subsection A of this section” following “through 10.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 47 deleted “conibear-style” preceding “body-gripping traps” in the second sentence and added the third sentence in subdivision A 9.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 10, in subdivision A 1, inserted “any person who hunts or kills” in clause (i) and inserted “birds in the family Rallidae or” in clause (ii); in subdivision A 10, deleted “but not limited to” following “including”; in subdivision A 11, deleted “but not limited to” preceding “subsection D”; substituted “(i) display of” for “but is not limited to, (i) showing” in the second paragraph of subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendment by c. 62 added clause (iv) in subdivision A 10 and made related changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 121, in clause (i) of subdivision A 10, inserted “or using turkey feathers or toes for making tools or utensils or selling such tools or utensils”; in subdivision A 11, deleted “but not limited to” following “including” in the first sentence; in the second paragraph of B, substituted “subsection” for “section”; and made minor stylistic changes. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2016 amendment by c. 372 added subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530, in subdivision A 3, inserted “an unloaded slingbow” in the second sentence, and “slingbow” in the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 113 and 620 are identical, and in subdivision A 1, deleted “which may be hunted until 2:00 a.m. on Sunday mornings” at the end of clause (i).

The 2018 amendments by cc. 557 and 558 are identical, and in subdivision A 3, inserted “an unloaded arrowgun” in the second sentence, and inserted “arrowgun” in the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 151, inserted “(i)” and added “or (ii) for the killing of nuisance species as defined in §

29.1-100

on private property by the owner of such property or his designee from a stationary automobile or other stationary vehicle” at the end of subdivision A 6.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 315, in subsection A, substituted “is” for “shall be” in the introductory language, and in subdivision A 2, substituted “harass” for “molest.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 631 added subdivision A 12.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 98 rewrote subdivision A 1, which read: “To hunt or kill any wild bird or wild animal, including any nuisance species, with a gun, firearm, or other weapon, or to hunt or kill any deer or bear with a gun, firearm, or other weapon with the aid or assistance of dogs, on Sunday. The provision of this subdivision that prohibits the hunting or killing of any wild bird or wild animal, including nuisance species, on Sunday shall not apply to (i) any person who hunts or kills raccoons; (ii) any person who hunts or kills birds in the family Rallidae or waterfowl, subject to geographical limitations established by the Director and except within 200 yards of a place of worship or any accessory structure thereof; or (iii) any landowner or member of his family or any person with written permission from the landowner who hunts or kills any wild bird or wild animal, including any nuisance species, on the landowner’s property, except within 200 yards of a place of worship or any accessory structure thereof. However, a person lawfully carrying a gun, firearm, or other weapon on Sunday in an area that could be used for hunting shall not be presumed to be hunting on Sunday, absent evidence to the contrary.”

Law Review.

For article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1015 (1997).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-583. License to Hunt on Property for a Specified Period.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Indians and Other Native Americans, § 3.

§ 29.1-521.1.
Willfully impeding hunting or trapping; penalty.

It is unlawful to willfully and intentionally impede the lawful hunting or trapping of wild birds or wild animals.

It is unlawful for any person or his agent to knowingly and intentionally facilitate or attempt to cause a violation of subdivision A 4 of §

29.1-521

by putting out bait or salt for any wildlife in any place used or occupied by hunters to hunt wild birds or wild animals.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1988, c. 584; 2010, c. 626.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 626 redesignated former subsection B as subsection C, and added subsection B; in subsection A, substituted “is unlawful” for “shall be unlawful”; and in subsection C, substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

“Lawful” hunting. —

Commonwealth failed to prove that the hunting defendant interfered with was lawful, even though one hunter had permission to hunt on property owned by defendant’s neighbor, because three others in the hunting party did not have permission, the first hunter had no authority to permit the other three to hunt on the neighbor’s property, and, as such, the three hunters were not lawfully hunting when defendant discharged a weapon into the ground near his home. Commonwealth v. Smith, 85 Va. Cir. 327, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 175 (Loudoun County Aug. 31, 2012).

§ 29.1-521.2.
Violation of § 18.2-286 while hunting; revocation of license and privileges.

Any firearm, crossbow, slingbow, arrowgun, or bow and arrow used by any person to hunt any game bird or game animal in a manner which violates §

18.2-286

may, upon conviction of such person violating §

18.2-286

, be forfeited to the Commonwealth by order of the court trying the case. The forfeiture shall be enforced as provided in Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2. The officer or other person seizing the property shall immediately give notice to the attorney for the Commonwealth.

The court may revoke the current hunting license and privileges of a person hunting any game bird or game animal in a manner that constitutes a violation of §

18.2-286

. The court may prohibit that person from hunting for a period of one to five years. If found hunting during this prohibited period, the person shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Notification of such revocation or prohibition shall be forwarded to the Department pursuant to subsection C of §

18.2-56.1

.

History.

1993, c. 322; 1994, c. 18; 2010, c. 183; 2012, cc. 283, 756; 2017, c. 530; 2018, cc. 557, 558.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 183, in subsection B, substituted “license and privileges” for “license, if any” and “that person from hunting for a period of one to five years” for “the issuance of any hunting license to that person for a period of up to five years.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 283 and 756 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.)” for “Chapter 22 (§

19.2-369

et seq.)” in subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 530 inserted “slingbow” in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 557 and 558 are identical, and inserted “arrowgun” in the first sentence of subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Weapons, § 9.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Applicable statute in forfeiture of firearm used by person convicted under §

18.2-286

. —

Subsection A of §

29.1-521.2

, with very rare possible exceptions, establishes the procedure to be used in forfeiting a firearm used by a person convicted of violating §

18.2-286

, rather than §

19.2-386.29

, which applies generally to criminal offenses. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Phillip C. Steele, Commonwealth’s Attorney for Giles County, 05-047, 2005 Va. AG LEXIS 33 (8/19/05).

The court convicting the violator has the discretion to declare a forfeiture of the firearm used in the crime and the Commonwealth’s attorney of the county or city wherein the forfeiture was incurred must file an information to enforce that forfeiture in the circuit court of his county or city. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Phillip C. Steele, Commonwealth’s Attorney for Giles County, 05-047, 2005 Va. AG LEXIS 33 (8/19/05).

§ 29.1-521.3.
Shooting wild birds and wild animals from stationary vehicles by disabled persons.

Any person, upon application to a conservation police officer and the presentation of a medical doctor’s written statement based on a physical examination that such person is permanently unable to walk due to impaired mobility, may, in the discretion of the conservation police officer, be issued a permit to shoot wild birds and wild animals from a stationary automobile or other vehicle during established open hunting seasons and in accordance with other laws and regulations. Permits issued pursuant to this section shall (i) be issued on a form provided by the Department, (ii) not authorize shooting from a stationary vehicle less than 50 feet from nor in or across any public road or highway subject to the provisions of §

29.1-526

, (iii) be issued for the lifetime of the permittee and be issued only to those persons who are properly licensed to hunt, and (iv) be nontransferable. Any permit found in the possession of any person not entitled to such permit shall be subject to confiscation by a conservation police officer.

History.

1994, c. 244; 2007, c. 87.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” in two places in the first sentence and in the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Tags are nontransferable. —

A Virginia hunter with a valid hunting license from the Virginia Department of Game and Inland Fisheries cannot transfer his hunting tags to another Virginia-licensed hunter to be used to harvest animals on behalf of the transferor. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, 13-050, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (2/21/14).

§ 29.1-522.
Unlawful to kill male deer unless antlers visible above hair.

Unless the Board declares otherwise by regulation, it shall be unlawful to kill male deer in any county or city of the Commonwealth unless the deer has antlers visible above the hair.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-144; 1952, c. 608; 1958, c. 444; 1975, c. 529; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-523.
Killing deer by use of certain lights; acts raising presumption of attempt to kill.

Any person who kills or attempts to kill any deer between a half hour after sunset and a half hour before sunrise by use of a light attached to any vehicle or a spotlight or flashlight shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. The flashing of a light attached to any vehicle or a spotlight or flashlight from any vehicle between a half hour after sunset and half hour before sunrise by any person or persons, then in possession of a firearm, crossbow, or bow and arrow or speargun, without good cause, shall raise a presumption of an attempt to kill deer in violation of this section. Every person in or on any such vehicle shall be deemed a principal in the second degree and subject to the same punishment as a principal in the first degree. Every person who, in any manner, aids, abets or acts in concert with any person or persons violating this section shall be deemed a principal in the second degree and subject to the same punishment as a principal in the first degree.

In addition to the penalty prescribed herein, the court shall revoke the current hunting license and privileges of the person convicted of violating this section and prohibit that person from hunting for a period of one to five years. If found hunting during this prohibited period, the person shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Notification of such revocation or prohibition shall be forwarded to the Department pursuant to subsections C and D of §

18.2-56.1

.

This section shall not apply to persons duly authorized to kill deer according to the provisions of §

29.1-529

.

History.

1962, c. 520, § 29-144.2; 1970, c. 79; 1973, c. 369; 1980, cc. 602, 607, § 29-144.4:1; 1987, c. 488; 1994, c. 113; 2002, c. 157; 2010, c. 183.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 157, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2003.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 157, effective January 1, 2003, substituted “firearm” for “rifle, shotgun, pistol” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 183, in the second paragraph, substituted “license and privileges” for “license, if any” and “that person from hunting for a period of one to five years” for “the issuance of any hunting license to that person for the next license year.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Game and Game Laws, §§ 1, 2, 5.